Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1730.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.21.030 and 2023 c 68 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of hazardous substances in this state. Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the rate of the tax is ((seven-tenths of one))0.7 percent multiplied by the wholesale value of the substance. Moneys collected under this subsection (1)(a) must be deposited in the model toxics control capital account.(b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2019, the rate of the tax on petroleum products is $1.09 per barrel. For subsequent fiscal years, the rate of tax on petroleum products is determined pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The tax collected under this subsection (1)(b) on petroleum products must be deposited as follows, after first depositing the tax as provided in (c) and (d) of this subsection, except that during the 2021-2023 biennium the deposit as provided in (c) of this subsection may be prorated equally across each month of the biennium:(i) Sixty percent to the model toxics control operating account created under RCW 70A.305.180;(ii) Twenty-five percent to the model toxics control capital account created under RCW 70A.305.190; and(iii) Fifteen percent to the model toxics control stormwater account created under RCW 70A.305.200.(c) Until the beginning of the ensuing biennium after the enactment of an additive transportation funding act, $50,000,000 per biennium to the motor vehicle fund to be used exclusively for transportation stormwater activities and projects. For purposes of this subsection, "additive transportation funding act" means an act enacted after June 30, 2023, in which the combined total of new revenues deposited into the motor vehicle fund and the multimodal transportation account exceed $2,000,000,000 per biennium attributable solely to an increase in revenue from the enactment of the act.(d) The proceeds from the imposition of the tax pursuant to (b) of this subsection (1) on aircraft fuel, as defined in RCW 82.42.010, must be deposited into the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090.(e) The department must compile a list of petroleum products that are not easily measured on a per barrel basis. Petroleum products identified on the list are subject to the rate under (a) of this subsection in lieu of the volumetric rate under (b) of this subsection. The list will be made in a form and manner prescribed by the department and must be made available on the department's internet website. In compiling the list, the department may accept technical assistance from persons that sell, market, or distribute petroleum products and consider any other resource the department finds useful in compiling the list.(2) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter. The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in this chapter.(3) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2020, the rate of tax on petroleum products for the previous fiscal year must be adjusted to reflect the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for nonresidential structures as published by the United States department of commerce, bureau of economic analysis for the most recent 12-month period ending December 31st of the prior year.Sec. 2. RCW 82.23B.020 and 2018 c 262 s 103 are each amended to read as follows:(1) An oil spill response tax is imposed on the privilege of receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this state; or (b) crude oil or petroleum products at a bulk oil terminal within this state from a tank car or pipeline. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car, pipeline, waterborne vessel, or barge at the rate of one cent per barrel of crude oil or petroleum product received.(2) In addition to the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section, an oil spill administration tax is imposed on the privilege of receiving: (a) Crude oil or petroleum products at a marine terminal within this state from a waterborne vessel or barge operating on the navigable waters of this state; or (b) crude oil or petroleum products at a bulk oil terminal within this state from a tank car or pipeline. The tax imposed in this section is levied upon the owner of the crude oil or petroleum products immediately after receipt of the same into the storage tanks of a marine or bulk oil terminal from a tank car, pipeline, waterborne vessel, or barge at the rate of four cents per barrel of crude oil or petroleum product.(3) The taxes imposed by this chapter must be collected by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from the taxpayer. If any person charged with collecting the taxes fails to bill the taxpayer for the taxes, or in the alternative has not notified the taxpayer in writing of the taxes imposed, or having collected the taxes, fails to pay them to the department in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of the person's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the person's control, he or she, nevertheless, is personally liable to the state for the amount of the taxes. Payment of the taxes by the owner to a marine or bulk oil terminal operator relieves the owner from further liability for the taxes.(4) Taxes collected under this chapter must be held in trust until paid to the department. Any person collecting the taxes who appropriates or converts the taxes collected is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the date payment is due. The taxes required by this chapter to be collected must be stated separately from other charges made by the marine or bulk oil terminal operator in any invoice or other statement of account provided to the taxpayer.(5) If a taxpayer fails to pay the taxes imposed by this chapter to the person charged with collection of the taxes and the person charged with collection fails to pay the taxes to the department, the department may, in its discretion, proceed directly against the taxpayer for collection of the taxes.(6) The taxes are due from the marine or bulk oil terminal operator, along with reports and returns on forms prescribed by the department, within ((twenty-five))25 days after the end of the month in which the taxable activity occurs.(7) The amount of taxes, until paid by the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal operator or to the department, constitutes a debt from the taxpayer to the marine or bulk oil terminal operator. Any person required to collect the taxes under this chapter who, with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter, fails or refuses to do so as required and any taxpayer who refuses to pay any taxes due under this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor as provided in chapter 9A.20 RCW.(8) Upon prior approval of the department, the taxpayer may pay the taxes imposed by this chapter directly to the department. The department must give its approval for direct payment under this section whenever it appears, in the department's judgment, that direct payment will enhance the administration of the taxes imposed under this chapter. The department must provide by rule for the issuance of a direct payment certificate to any taxpayer qualifying for direct payment of the taxes. Good faith acceptance of a direct payment certificate by a terminal operator relieves the marine or bulk oil terminal operator from any liability for the collection or payment of the taxes imposed under this chapter.(9)(a) ((All))Except as provided in (c) of this subsection, all receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the state oil spill response account.(b) Beginning in fiscal year 2019 and each fiscal year thereafter, the first ((two hundred thousand dollars))$200,000 of receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the military department active state service account created in RCW 38.40.220, and the remainder of the receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (2) of this section must be deposited into the oil spill prevention account or the aeronautics account, as provided in this subsection (9).(c) The receipts from the tax imposed in subsection (1) of this section on aircraft fuel as defined in RCW 82.42.010, must be deposited into the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090.(10) Within ((forty-five))45 days after the end of each calendar quarter, the office of financial management must determine the balance of the oil spill response account as of the last day of that calendar quarter. Balance determinations by the office of financial management under this section are final and may not be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed under this chapter. The office of financial management must promptly notify the departments of revenue and ecology of the account balance once a determination is made. For each subsequent calendar quarter, the tax imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall be imposed during the entire calendar quarter unless:(a) Tax was imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than ((nine million dollars))$9,000,000; or(b) Tax was not imposed under subsection (1) of this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than ((eight million dollars))$8,000,000.Sec. 3. RCW 82.23A.020 and 2023 c 170 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A tax is imposed on the privilege of possession of petroleum products in this state. The rate of the tax shall be ((thirty one-hundredths of one))0.31 percent multiplied by the wholesale value of the petroleum product. For purposes of determining the tax imposed under this section for petroleum products introduced at the rack, the wholesale value is determined when the petroleum product is removed at the rack unless the removal is to an exporter licensed under chapter 82.38 RCW for direct delivery to a destination outside of the state. For all other cases, the wholesale value is determined upon the first nonbulk possession in the state.(2)(a) Except as identified in RCW 70A.345.130, or provided in (b) of this subsection, moneys collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the pollution liability insurance program trust account under RCW 70A.325.020.(b) Moneys collected under this chapter due to the imposition of the tax in subsection (1) of this section on aircraft fuel, as defined in RCW 82.42.010, must be deposited into the aeronautics account created in RCW 82.42.090.(3) Chapter 82.32 RCW applies to the tax imposed in this chapter. The tax due dates, reporting periods, and return requirements applicable to chapter 82.04 RCW apply equally to the tax imposed in this chapter.(4) Within 30 days after the end of each calendar quarter the department shall determine the "quarterly balance," which shall be the cash balance in the pollution liability insurance program trust account as of the last day of that calendar quarter, after excluding the reserves determined for that quarter under RCW 70A.325.020(2) and chapter 70A.545 RCW. Balance determinations by the department under this section are final and shall not be used to challenge the validity of any tax imposed under this section. For each subsequent calendar quarter, tax shall be imposed under this section during the entire calendar quarter unless:(a) Tax was imposed under this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than $30,000,000; or(b) Tax was not imposed under this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter, and the most recent quarterly balance is more than $15,000,000.Sec. 4. RCW 82.42.090 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 42 are each amended to read as follows:(1) All moneys collected by the director from the aircraft fuel excise tax as provided in RCW 82.42.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and shall be credited to the aeronautics account hereby created in the state treasury. (2) Moneys resulting from the taxes in RCW 82.21.030, 82.23A.020, and 82.23B.020 on aircraft fuel must be deposited into this account.(3) Moneys collected from the consumer or user of aircraft fuel from either the use tax imposed by RCW 82.12.020 or the retail sales tax imposed by RCW 82.08.020 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and credited to the state general fund.--- END ---